apertium-myv-fin.myv.lexc
LEXICON _ЛАК-NomPl-Conjugation-only-4Poss
 _КАЛ-NomPl-Conjugation-only-4Poss ;
 NounEnd_K-lak  ;

LEXICON _ЛАК-Conjugation
 _КАЛ-Conjugation ;
 NounEnd_K-lak  ;

LEXICON _ЛАК-Conjugation-4Poss
 _КАЛ-Conjugation-4Poss ;
 NounEnd_K-lak  ;

LEXICON _КИТ-NomSg-Conjugation
 _КАЛ-NomSg-Conjugation ;

LEXICON _КИТ-NomPl-Conjugation
 _КАЛ-NomPl-Conjugation ;

LEXICON _КИТ-NomPl-Conjugation-4Poss
 _КАЛ-NomPl-Conjugation-4Poss ;

LEXICON _КИТ-NomPl-Conjugation-only
 _КАЛ-NomPl-Conjugation-only ;

LEXICON _КИТ-NomPl-Conjugation-only-4Poss
 _КАЛ-NomPl-Conjugation-only-4Poss ;

LEXICON _КИТ-Conjugation
 _КАЛ-Conjugation ;

LEXICON _КИТ-Conjugation-4Poss
 _КАЛ-Conjugation-4Poss ;


LEXICON _КАЛ-NomSg-Conjugation
 K ;
 DER/PR_SG ;

LEXICON DER/PR_SG
!! _КАЛ-NomSg-Conjugation-only
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-SG1 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-SG2 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-SG3 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-SG1 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-SG2 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-SG3 ;

LEXICON _КАЛ-NomPl-Conjugation
 K ;
 _КАЛ-NomPl-Conjugation-only ;

LEXICON _КАЛ-NomPl-Conjugation-4Poss
 K ;
 _КАЛ-NomPl-Conjugation-only-4Poss ;

LEXICON _КАЛ-NomPl-Conjugation-only
 DER/PR_PL-MUTUAL ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-PL3 ;

LEXICON _КАЛ-NomPl-Conjugation-only-4Poss
 DER/PR_PL-MUTUAL ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-PL3_ZERO ;



LEXICON _КАЛ-Conjugation
 DER/PR_SG ;
 _КАЛ-NomPl-Conjugation-only ;
 K ;

LEXICON _КАЛ-Conjugation-4Poss
 DER/PR_SG ;
 _КАЛ-NomPl-Conjugation-only-4Poss ;
 K ;

LEXICON _ОШ-NomSg-Conjugation
 _КАЛ-NomSg-Conjugation ;

LEXICON _ОШ-Conjugation
 DER/PR_SG ;
 _КАЛ-NomPl-Conjugation-only ;
 K ;

LEXICON sajems-Conjugation
 _КАЛ-Conjugation ;
%<der_pred%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<ocsg1%>%<use_sub%>%<dial%>:%>самизь K ;
%<der_pred%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<ocsg2%>%<use_sub%>%<dial%>:%>тА2дызь K ;
%<der_pred%>%<ind%>%<prt2%>%<ocsg1%>%<use_sub%>%<dial%>:%>%^О2лимизь K ;
%<der_pred%>%<ind%>%<prt2%>%<ocsg2%>%<use_sub%>%<dial%>:%>%^О2лидизь K ;
%<der_pred%>%<ind%>%<prt2%>%<ocsg3%>%<use_sub%>%<dial%>:%>%^О2лизь K ;
%<der_pred%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<ocpl1%>%<use_sub%>%<dial%>:%>самизь K ;
%<der_pred%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<ocpl2%>%<use_sub%>%<dial%>:%>тА2дызь K ;
%<der_pred%>%<ind%>%<prt2%>%<ocpl1%>%<use_sub%>%<dial%>:%>%^О2лимизь K ;
%<der_pred%>%<ind%>%<prt2%>%<ocpl2%>%<use_sub%>%<dial%>:%>%^О2лидизь K ;
%<der_pred%>%<ind%>%<prt2%>%<ocpl3%>%<use_sub%>%<dial%>:%>%^О2лизь K ;



LEXICON _ПАНГО-NomSg-Conjugation
 _КУДО-NomSg-Conjugation ;

LEXICON _ПАНГО-NomPl-Conjugation
 K ;
 _ПАНГО-NomPl-Conjugation-only ;

LEXICON _ПАНГО-NomPl-Conjugation-only
 DER/PR_PL ;

LEXICON _ПАНГО-Conjugation
 _КУДО-Conjugation ;


!
LEXICON _КУДО-NomSg-Conjugation
 K ;
 _КУДО-NomSg-Conjugation-only ;

LEXICON _КУДО-NomSg-Conjugation-only
%<der_pred%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scsg1%>%<dial%>:%>ян K ;
%<der_pred%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scsg2%>%<dial%>:%>ят K ;
 DER/PR_SG ;

LEXICON _КУДО-NomPl-Conjugation
 K ;
 DER/PR_PL ;

LEXICON _КУДО-NomPl-Conjugation-4Poss
 K ;
 _КУДО-NomPl-Conjugation-only-4Poss ;

LEXICON DER/PR_PL
!! _КУДО-NomPl-Conjugation-only
 DER/PR_PL-MUTUAL ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-PL3 ;

LEXICON _КУДО-NomPl-Conjugation-only-4Poss
 DER/PR_PL-MUTUAL ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-PL3_ZERO ;

LEXICON DER/PR_PL-MUTUAL
!! _КУДО-NomPl-Conjugation-only-mutual
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-PL1 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-PL2 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-PL1 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-PL2 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-PL3 ;

LEXICON _КУДО-Conjugation
 _КУДО-NomSg-Conjugation-only ;
 DER/PR_PL ;
 K ;

LEXICON _КУДО-Conjugation-4Poss
 _КУДО-NomSg-Conjugation-only ;
 _КУДО-NomPl-Conjugation-only-4Poss ;
 K ;



LEXICON Tenses1
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-SG1 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-SG2 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-PL1 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRS-PL2 ;

 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-SG1 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-SG2 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-SG3 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-PL1 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-PL2 ;
 DER/PR-IND-PRT2-PL3 ;


LEXICON DER/PR-IND-PRS-SG1 
%<der_pred%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scsg1%>@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.TPERS.1@@D.TNUM.PL@:%>А2н0@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.TPERS.1@@D.TNUM.PL@ K ;

LEXICON DER/PR-IND-PRS-SG2 
%<der_pred%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scsg2%>@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.TPERS.2@@D.TNUM.PL@:%>А2т0@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.TPERS.2@@D.TNUM.PL@ K ;

LEXICON DER/PR-IND-PRS-SG3 
%<der_pred%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scsg3%>@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.TPERS.3@@D.TNUM.PL@:0000@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.TPERS.3@@D.TNUM.PL@ K ;

LEXICON DER/PR-IND-PRS-PL1 
%<der_pred%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scpl1%>0@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.TPERS.1@@D.TNUM.SG@:%>тА2но@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.TPERS.1@@D.TNUM.SG@ K ;

LEXICON DER/PR-IND-PRS-PL2 
%<der_pred%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scpl2%>0@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.TPERS.2@@D.TNUM.SG@:%>тА2до@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.TPERS.2@@D.TNUM.SG@ K ;

LEXICON DER/PR-IND-PRS-PL3
%<der_pred%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scpl3%>@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.TPERS.3@@D.TNUM.SG@:%>тЬ20@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.TPERS.3@@D.TNUM.SG@ K ;

LEXICON DER/PR-IND-PRS-PL3_ZERO
%<der_pred%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<scpl3%>@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.TPERS.3@@D.TNUM.SG@:0000@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@@U.TPERS.3@@D.TNUM.SG@ K ;

LEXICON DER/PR-IND-PRT2-SG1
%<der_pred%>%<ind%>%<prt2%>%<scsg1%>00@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.TPERS.1@@D.TNUM.PL@:%>%^О2линь@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.TPERS.1@@D.TNUM.PL@ K ;

LEXICON DER/PR-IND-PRT2-SG2
%<der_pred%>%<ind%>%<prt2%>%<scsg2%>00@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.TPERS.2@@D.TNUM.PL@:%>%^О2лить@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.TPERS.2@@D.TNUM.PL@ K ;

LEXICON DER/PR-IND-PRT2-SG3
%<der_pred%>%<ind%>%<prt2%>%<scsg3%>@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.TPERS.3@@D.TNUM.PL@:%>%^О2ль@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.TPERS.3@@D.TNUM.PL@ K ;

LEXICON DER/PR-IND-PRT2-PL1
%<der_pred%>%<ind%>%<prt2%>%<scpl1%>000@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.TPERS.1@@D.TNUM.SG@:%>%^О2линек@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.TPERS.1@@D.TNUM.SG@ K ;

LEXICON DER/PR-IND-PRT2-PL2
%<der_pred%>%<ind%>%<prt2%>%<scpl2%>00@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.TPERS.2@@D.TNUM.SG@:%>%^О2лиде@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.TPERS.2@@D.TNUM.SG@ K ;

LEXICON DER/PR-IND-PRT2-PL3
%<der_pred%>%<ind%>%<prt2%>%<scpl3%>00@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.TPERS.3@@D.TNUM.SG@:%>%^О2льть@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@@U.TPERS.3@@D.TNUM.SG@ K ;

!!



!! NOUNS
!! Kinship 

LEXICON N_КАЛ_KIN
%<n%>%<sem_hum%>%<sem_kin%>@P.POS.N@:000@P.POS.N@ NMN_КАЛ ;
 N-KIN ;

LEXICON N_ЛАК_KIN
%<n%>%<sem_hum%>%<sem_kin%>@P.POS.N@:000@P.POS.N@ NMN_ЛАК ;
 N-KIN ;

LEXICON N_КИТ_KIN
%<n%>%<sem_hum%>%<sem_kin%>@P.POS.N@:000@P.POS.N@ NMN_КИТ ;
 N-KIN ;

LEXICON N_ОШ_KIN
%<n%>%<sem_hum%>%<sem_kin%>@P.POS.N@:000@P.POS.N@ NMN_ОШ ;
 N-KIN ;

LEXICON N_КЛАСС_KIN
%<n%>%<sem_hum%>%<sem_kin%>@P.POS.N@:000@P.POS.N@ NMN_КЛАСС ;
 N-KIN ;

LEXICON N_ПАНГО_KIN
%<n%>%<sem_hum%>%<sem_kin%>@P.POS.N@:000@P.POS.N@ NMN_ПАНГО ;
 N-KIN ;

LEXICON N_ТИНГЕ_KIN
%<n%>%<sem_hum%>%<sem_kin%>@P.POS.N@:000@P.POS.N@ NMN_ТИНГЕ ;
 N-KIN ;

LEXICON N_КУДО_KIN
%<n%>%<sem_hum%>%<sem_kin%>@P.POS.N@:000@P.POS.N@ NMN_КУДО ;
 N-KIN ;


!! !!Human 

LEXICON N_КАЛ_HUM
%<n%>%<sem_hum%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ NMN_КАЛ ;

LEXICON N_ЛАК_HUM
%<n%>%<sem_hum%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ NMN_ЛАК ;

LEXICON N_КИТ_HUM
%<n%>%<sem_hum%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ NMN_КИТ ;

LEXICON N_ОШ_HUM
%<n%>%<sem_hum%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ NMN_ОШ ;

LEXICON N_КЛАСС_HUM
%<n%>%<sem_hum%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ NMN_КЛАСС ;

LEXICON N_ПАНГО_HUM
%<n%>%<sem_hum%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ NMN_ПАНГО ;

LEXICON N_ТИНГЕ_HUM
%<n%>%<sem_hum%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ NMN_ТИНГЕ ;

LEXICON N_ТЕШТЕ_HUM
%<n%>%<sem_hum%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ NMN_ТЕШТЕ ;

LEXICON N_КУДО_HUM
%<n%>%<sem_hum%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ NMN_КУДО ;

!! Place 
LEXICON N_КАЛ_PLC
%<n%>%<sem_plc%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ NMN_КАЛ ;
%<n%>%<sem_plc%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_ЛАК_PLC
%<n%>%<sem_plc%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ NMN_ЛАК ;
%<n%>%<sem_plc%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_КИТ_PLC
%<n%>%<sem_plc%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ NMN_КИТ ;
%<n%>%<sem_plc%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_ОШ_PLC
%<n%>%<sem_plc%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ NMN_ОШ ;
%<n%>%<sem_plc%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_КЛАСС_PLC
%<n%>%<sem_plc%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ NMN_КЛАСС ;
%<n%>%<sem_plc%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_ПАНГО_PLC
%<n%>%<sem_plc%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ NMN_ПАНГО ;
%<n%>%<sem_plc%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_ТИНГЕ_PLC
%<n%>%<sem_plc%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ NMN_ТИНГЕ ;
%<n%>%<sem_plc%>@P.POS.N@:00@P.POS.N@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON Nouns
ававтыне:ававтыне N_КУДО_KIN  "" ;
авардикурго:авардикург N_ПАНГО_HUM  "" ;
авкине:авкине N_КУДО_KIN  "" ;
азербайджанец:азербайджанец N_ОШ_HUM  "azeri" ;
антекрист:антекрист N_КИТ_HUM  "" ;
атявтке:атявтке N_КУДО_HUM  "" ;
аштитейтерь:аштитейтерь N_КАЛ_HUM  "" ;
батист:батист N_КИТ_HUM  "batisti" ;
бельгиец:бельгиец N_ОШ_HUM  "belgialainen" ;
берёк:берёк N_ЛАК_PLC  "ranta" ;
ботаник:ботаник N_ЛАК_HUM  "kasvitieteilijä, botanisti" ;
боцькаланго:боцька#ланг N_ПАНГО_PLC  "" ;
вальмаютко:вальма#ютк N_ПАНГО_PLC  "" ;
варданка:варданка N_КУДО_HUM  "orjatar; palvelijatar" ;
варжампатя:варжампатя N_КУДО_KIN  "" ;
васолбаба:васоло#баба N_КУДО_KIN  "äidinäiti" ;
васолбодяй:васолбодяй N_КАЛ_KIN  "" ;
васолпатя:васолпатя N_КУДО_KIN  "äidin sisko, täti" ;
ведьберёк:ведьберёк N_ЛАК_PLC  "" ;
ведьланго:ведь#ланг N_ПАНГО_PLC  "" ;
вежэйде:вежэйдь N_ТЕШТЕ_HUM  "" ;
вечкабодя:вечкабодя N_КУДО_KIN  "" ;
вирьютко:вирь#ютк N_ПАНГО_PLC  "" ;
военкомат:военкомат N_КИТ_PLC  "sotakomissariaatti" ;
вокзал:вокзал N_КАЛ_PLC  "asema" ;
гараж:гараж N_ОШ_PLC  "autotalli" ;
геолог:геолог N_КАЛ_HUM  "geologi" ;
гестаповец:гестаповец N_ОШ_HUM  "" ;
дагестанава:дагестан#ава N_КУДО_HUM  "" ;
декабрист:декабрист N_КИТ_HUM  "dekabristi" ;
десятник:десятник N_ЛАК_HUM  "" ;
диакон:диакон N_КАЛ_HUM  "" ;
загс:загс N_ОШ_PLC  "siviilirekisteritoimisto" ;
землевладелец:землевладелец N_ОШ_HUM  "" ;
идемломань:идемломань N_КАЛ_HUM  "" ;
идемэйде:идемэйдь N_ТЕШТЕ_HUM  "" ;
инебаба:инебаба N_КУДО_KIN  "" ;
иневедь:ине#ведь N_КАЛ_PLC  "meri, valtameri" ;
институт:институт N_КИТ_PLC  "instituutti, tutkimuslaitos; instituutio; sisäoppilaitos (aatelistyttöjä varten Venäjällä ennen vallankumousta)" ;
ирландец:ирландец N_ОШ_HUM  "" ;
кабинет:кабинет N_КИТ_PLC  "työhuone; hallitus, ministeristö, kabinetti" ;
казахава:казах#ава N_КУДО_HUM  "" ;
каменщик:каменщик N_ЛАК_HUM  "muurari, kivityömies" ;
кардаз:кардаз N_ОШ_PLC  "piha" ;
кардо:кард N_ПАНГО_PLC  "läävä, navetta, talli" ;
карьерист:карьерист N_КИТ_HUM  "" ;
кирашко:ки#рашк N_ПАНГО_PLC  "" ;
класс:класс N_ОШ_PLC  "luokka" ;
клуб:клуб N_КАЛ_PLC  "kerho" ;
кореец:кореец N_ОШ_HUM  "korealainen" ;
крепость:крепость N_КИТ_PLC  "linna, linnoitus" ;
крестник:кресник N_ЛАК_KIN  "" ;
крестник:крестник N_ЛАК_KIN  "" ;
кудоава:кудо#ава N_КУДО_HUM  "" ;
кузвирь:куз#вирь N_КАЛ_PLC  "" ;
курорт:курорт N_КИТ_PLC  "kylpylä, kylpylaitos" ;
лейлатко:лей#латк N_ПАНГО_PLC  "" ;
леля:леля N_КУДО_KIN  "isoveli; setä, eno" ;
ломаломань:ломаломань N_КАЛ_HUM  "" ;
любовник:любовник N_ЛАК_HUM  "" ;
манастырь:манастырь N_КАЛ_PLC  "" ;
мацт:мацт N_КИТ_PLC  "kellari(kuoppa)" ;
меря:меря N_КУДО_HUM  "" ;
монархист:монархист N_КИТ_HUM  "monarkisti" ;
монастырь:монастырь N_КАЛ_PLC  "" ;
олимпиец:олимпиец N_ОШ_HUM  "" ;
офтальмолог:офтальмолог N_КАЛ_HUM  "" ;
паксяютко:пакся#ютк N_ПАНГО_PLC  "" ;
парк:парк N_ЛАК_PLC  "puisto" ;
пелевеёнкс:пелевеёнкс N_ОШ_PLC  "pohjoinen" ;
подкулачник:подкулачник N_ЛАК_HUM  "" ;
приёмщик:приёмщик N_ЛАК_HUM  "" ;
пропагандист:пропагандист N_КИТ_HUM  "" ;
прявтош:прявтош N_ОШ_PLC  "" ;
сад:сад N_КАЛ_PLC  "puutarha, puisto" ;
сварщик:сварщик N_ЛАК_HUM  "" ;
сельсовет:сельсовет N_КИТ_PLC  "kyläneuvosto; kyläneuvostoalue" ;
семитолог:семитолог N_КАЛ_HUM  "" ;
совхоз:совхоз N_ОШ_PLC  "" ;
специалист:специалист N_КИТ_HUM  "spesialisti, erikoistuntija, ammattimies; mestari" ;
стольначальник:стольначальник N_ЛАК_HUM  "" ;
сырькай:сырькай N_КАЛ_KIN  "(vokatiivi) äidin vanhempi sisko" ;
таджикава:таджик#ава N_КУДО_HUM  "" ;
тейтерьэйде:тейтерьэйдь N_ТЕШТЕ_HUM  "" ;
тейтерьэйкакш:тейтерьэйкакш N_ОШ_HUM  "" ;
тёщабаба:тёщабаба N_КУДО_KIN  "" ;
фармаколог:фармаколог N_КАЛ_HUM  "" ;
фашист:фашист N_КИТ_HUM  "fasisti" ;
фронт:фронт N_КИТ_PLC  "rintama" ;
царьава:царь#ава N_КУДО_HUM  "" ;
цёраэйде:цёраэйдь N_ТЕШТЕ_HUM  "" ;
штукатур:штукатур N_КАЛ_HUM  "rappaaja, rappari" ;
экономист:экономист N_КИТ_HUM  "taloustieteilijä" ;
экскаваторщик:экскаваторщик N_ЛАК_HUM  "" ;
эрьке:эрьк N_ТИНГЕ_PLC  "" ;
ён:ён N_КАЛ_PLC  "puoli, taho" ;
ёнкс:ёнкс N_ОШ_PLC  "puoli, suunta" ;
